
































Coty Inc. (COTY) Cut to “Strong Sell” at BidaskClub - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for Coty Inc.
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Coty Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Care.com, Inc. (CRCM) Raised to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research
Compass Diversified Holdings (CODI) Downgraded by BidaskClub
Coty Inc. (COTY) Cut to “Strong Sell” at BidaskClub
Shire PLC (SHPG) Shares Bought by TNB Financial
Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (TMO) Stake Maintained by North American Management Corp
General Motors Company (GM) Shares Bought by Advisors Capital Management LLC
Nordstrom, Inc. (JWN) Position Maintained by Cohen Klingenstein LLC
BerganKDV Wealth Management LLC Acquires 17 Shares of Phillips 66 (PSX)
Peoples Financial Services CORP. Sells 87 Shares of Enbridge Inc (NYSE:ENB)
Franklin Universal Trust (NYSE:FT) to Issue Jul 17 Dividend of $0.03
TNB Financial Has $1.11 Million Position in Vodafone Group PLC (VOD)
M&T Bank Corporation (MTB) Shares Bought by TNB Financial
Salesforce.com Inc (NYSE:CRM) Position Reduced by Fox Run Management L.L.C.
Sally Beauty Holdings, Inc. (SBH) Cut to Sell at BidaskClub
Audentes Therapeutics, Inc. (NASDAQ:BOLD) Raised to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research
Zacks Investment Research Downgrades The Chefs’ Warehouse, Inc. (NASDAQ:CHEF) to Hold
Zacks Investment Research Upgrades Conifer Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:CNFR) to Hold
Community Health Systems, Inc. (NYSE:CYH) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Research
Verizon Communications Inc. (VZ) Stake Reduced by Cape Cod Five Cents Savings Bank
Yum! Brands, Inc. (NYSE:YUM) Stake Reduced by Horan Capital Management




 


Coty Inc. (COTY) Cut to “Strong Sell” at BidaskClub

					Posted by Michael Walen on Jul 17th, 2017 // No Comments 




BidaskClub cut shares of Coty Inc. (NYSE:COTY) from a sell rating to a strong sell rating in a report issued on Wednesday.
A number of other analysts have also recently commented on COTY. J P Morgan Chase & Co initiated coverage on Coty in a research note on Tuesday, March 21st. They issued an underweight rating and a $16.00 price target for the company. BMO Capital Markets  reissued a buy rating and set a $24.00 target price on shares of Coty in a research note on Tuesday, April 4th. Zacks Investment Research raised Coty from a sell rating to a hold rating in a research report on Thursday, April 13th. Barclays PLC  set a $19.00 price target on Coty and gave the stock a hold rating in a research report on Saturday, May 13th. Finally, Jefferies Group LLC started coverage on Coty in a research report on Friday, June 2nd. They set a hold rating and a $17.00 price target for the company. Three analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, nine have issued  a hold rating and five have issued  a buy rating to the company. The stock currently has a consensus rating of Hold and an average price target of $23.17.


 Get Coty Inc. alerts:



Coty (COTY) traded up 0.33% during mid-day trading on Wednesday, hitting $18.44. 3,279,799 shares of the company traded hands. Coty has a one year low of $16.95 and a one year high of $30.13. The company’s 50-day moving average price is $19.01 and its 200 day moving average price is $18.71. The company’s market capitalization is $13.79 billion. 




Coty (NYSE:COTY) last announced its quarterly earnings results on Wednesday, May 10th. The company reported $0.15 EPS for the quarter, beating analysts’ consensus estimates of $0.11 by $0.04. The company had revenue of $2.03 million during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $1.94 billion. Coty had a positive return on equity of 9.12% and a negative net margin of 2.29%. Coty’s revenue was down 99.8% on a year-over-year basis. During the same period in the prior year, the business posted $0.09 EPS.  On average, analysts anticipate that  Coty will post $0.75 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 
COPYRIGHT VIOLATION NOTICE: “Coty Inc. (COTY) Cut to “Strong Sell” at BidaskClub” was  reported by Markets Daily and is owned by of Markets Daily. If you are reading this news story on another domain, it was copied illegally and republished in violation of U.S. & international copyright & trademark law. The original version of this news story can be read at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/17/coty-inc-coty-cut-to-strong-sell-at-bidaskclub.html. 
In related news, insider Greerson Greene Mcmullen acquired 11,300 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Thursday, May 25th. The shares were acquired at an average price of $18.87 per share, with a total value of $213,231.00. Following the acquisition, the insider now owns 79,307 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $1,496,523.09. The transaction was disclosed in a filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which is accessible through the SEC website. Also, Director Peter Harf acquired 26,500 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Friday, June 16th. The shares were bought at an average cost of $19.00 per share, for a total transaction of $503,500.00. The disclosure for this purchase can be found here. In the last three months, insiders acquired 188,620 shares of company stock worth $3,588,363. Insiders own  16.10% of the company’s stock. 
About Coty
Coty Inc is a beauty company. The Company operates through four segments: Fragrances, Color Cosmetics, Skin & Body Care and Brazil Acquisition. Its fragrance products include a range of men’s and women’s products. Its fragrance brands include Calvin Klein, Marc Jacobs, Davidoff, Chloe, Balenciaga, Beyonce, Bottega Veneta, Miu Miu and Roberto Cavalli.







Receive News & Ratings for Coty Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Coty Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website





































































 

































Coty Inc. (COTY) Insider Greerson Greene Mcmullen Purchases 20,200 Shares - American Banking News




















































Home
Get Email Updates
About
Disclaimer
Contact
Privacy Policy









 
			

















Business News
U.S. News
World News
Stock Ratings

Analysts' Upgrades
Analysts' Downgrades
Analysts' EPS Estimates
Analysts' Price Targets
Analysts' New Coverage


Corporate Earnings

Earnings Results
Earnings Guidance
Earnings Previews


Dividends
Insider Trades
Options
Press Releases






















Coty Inc. - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for Coty Inc. with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 











 Recent Stories


Credit Suisse Group AG Reaffirms “Outperform” Rating for Zpg Plc (ZPLA)


HSBC Holdings plc Reiterates Buy Rating for Pennon Group plc (PNN)


Moneysupermarket.Com Group PLC (MONY) Rating Reiterated by Barclays PLC


Prudential plc (LON:PRU) Stock Rating Reaffirmed by Barclays PLC


Inmarsat Plc (ISAT) PT Lowered to GBX 830 at HSBC Holdings plc


South32 Ltd (LON:S32) Rating Reiterated by Barclays PLC


Credit Suisse Group AG Reaffirms “Underperform” Rating for National Grid plc (NG)


United Utilities Group PLC (UU) Price Target Cut to GBX 1,000


Dixons Carphone PLC (LON:DC) Given “Outperform” Rating at Credit Suisse Group AG


Tullow Oil plc’s (TLW) “Overweight” Rating Reiterated at Barclays PLC


Severn Trent Plc (LON:SVT) Earns Hold Rating from HSBC Holdings plc


easyJet plc (LON:EZJ) PT Raised to GBX 1,600


KCOM Group PLC (LON:KCOM) Given Buy Rating at Peel Hunt


Enquest Plc (ENQ) Earns “Underweight” Rating from Barclays PLC


Premier Oil PLC (LON:PMO) Rating Reiterated by Barclays PLC


Analyzing DNIB Unwind (BIND) and Anavex Life Sciences Corp. (AVXL)


Comparing Callaway Golf (ELY) & Johnson Outdoors (JOUT)


Comparing Bankrate (NYSE:RATE) & IHS Markit (INFO)


Patterson Companies (PDCO) vs. Merit Medical Systems (MMSI) Head-To-Head Contrast


Financial Comparison: Crane (CR) and SPX Corporation (NYSE:SPXC)





 






						Coty Inc. (COTY) Insider Greerson Greene Mcmullen Purchases 20,200 Shares					

June 16th, 2017  • 0 comments • Filed Under •
 by ABMN Staff



							Filed Under: Insider Trades • Market News 






Tweet










Coty Inc. (NYSE:COTY) insider Greerson Greene Mcmullen bought 20,200 shares of the company’s stock in a transaction on Wednesday, June 14th. The shares were bought at an average price of $19.32 per share, for a total transaction of $390,264.00. Following the transaction, the insider now owns 99,507 shares of the company’s stock, valued at $1,922,475.24. The transaction was disclosed in a legal filing with the SEC, which is available at this link. 
Greerson Greene Mcmullen also recently made the following trade(s): 


 Get Coty Inc. alerts:




On Thursday, May 25th, Greerson Greene Mcmullen bought 11,300 shares of Coty stock. The shares were bought at an average price of $18.87 per share, for a total transaction of $213,231.00. 
On Tuesday, May 23rd, Greerson Greene Mcmullen bought 14,350 shares of Coty stock. The shares were bought at an average price of $18.92 per share, for a total transaction of $271,502.00. 

Coty Inc. (NYSE COTY) traded up 0.26% on Friday, reaching $19.05. The company had a trading volume of 4,211,945 shares. The stock’s 50 day moving average price is $18.78 and its 200-day moving average price is $18.69. The stock’s market capitalization is $14.24 billion. Coty Inc. has a 12-month low of $16.95 and a 12-month high of $30.13. 




Coty (NYSE:COTY) last announced its quarterly earnings results on Wednesday, May 10th. The company reported $0.15 EPS for the quarter, topping the consensus estimate of $0.11 by $0.04. The business had revenue of $2.03 million for the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $1.94 billion. Coty had a negative net margin of 2.29% and a positive return on equity of 9.12%. The business’s quarterly revenue was down 99.8% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same quarter in the previous year, the company earned $0.09 EPS.  Equities analysts expect that  Coty Inc. will post $0.76 earnings per share for the current fiscal year. 

The business also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Tuesday, June 13th. Shareholders of record on Wednesday, May 31st were paid a $0.125 dividend. This represents a $0.50 annualized dividend and a yield of 2.62%. The ex-dividend date  was Friday, May 26th. Coty’s payout ratio is currently -200.00%. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION NOTICE: “Coty Inc. (COTY) Insider Greerson Greene Mcmullen Purchases 20,200 Shares” was  published by American Banking News and is owned by of American Banking News. If you are viewing this story on another website, it was illegally copied and republished in violation of US & international copyright and trademark laws. The original version of this story can be read at https://www.americanbankingnews.com/2017/06/16/coty-inc-coty-insider-greerson-greene-mcmullen-purchases-20200-shares.html. 
Several research firms have issued reports on COTY. Societe Generale began coverage on Coty in a research report on Monday. They set a “buy” rating and a $21.00 target price on the stock. Barclays PLC  set a $19.00 target price on Coty and gave the stock a “hold” rating in a research report on Saturday, May 13th. Jefferies Group LLC began coverage on Coty in a research report on Friday, June 2nd. They set a “hold” rating and a $17.00 target price on the stock. J P Morgan Chase & Co began coverage on Coty in a research report on Tuesday, March 21st. They set an “underweight” rating and a $16.00 target price on the stock. Finally, Royal Bank of Canada  restated a “hold” rating and set a $22.00 target price on shares of Coty in a research report on Thursday, June 8th. Two research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, nine have given a hold rating and five have issued  a buy rating to the company. The company currently has a consensus rating of “Hold” and a consensus price target of $23.17.
About Coty
Coty Inc is a beauty company. The Company operates through four segments: Fragrances, Color Cosmetics, Skin & Body Care and Brazil Acquisition. Its fragrance products include a range of men’s and women’s products. Its fragrance brands include Calvin Klein, Marc Jacobs, Davidoff, Chloe, Balenciaga, Beyonce, Bottega Veneta, Miu Miu and Roberto Cavalli.




Receive News & Ratings for Coty Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Coty Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 































Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!











			© Copyright American Banking and Market News 2006-2017. All rights reserved. 

Privacy Policy and Disclosures |
			About | Advertising 
			| Contact







Content on this website is not meant to be a recommendation or an offer to buy or sell any security. Click here to read our full disclaimer.












































Greerson Greene McMullen - Atlanta, GA | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Greerson Greene Mcmullen in Atlanta, GA


Greerson Greene Mcmullen

                                                                           Intelius found that Greerson Greene McMullen  is  a male between 50 and 60 years old from Atlanta, GA.  We have connected them to
                25 addresses,
                17 phones,
                and 2 relatives or associates.
         





Also Known As

Greer G Mcmullen


Get Report Now

Age

Greerson Greene Mcmullen is in his 50s

Greerson Has Lived In

Atlanta, GA
Keswick, VA
Melbourne, FL

Greerson's Relatives

Ann McMullen
Claire McMullen







Greerson Greene Mcmullen



Zodiac SignGemini



GenderMale



Professional Status
Senior Vice President, Legal at The ServiceMaster Company



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Greerson? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Greerson, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Greerson Greene Mcmullen
Get a Criminal Check on Greerson Greene Mcmullen
Get a Public Record Report on Greerson Greene Mcmullen
Get a People Search Report on Greerson Greene Mcmullen


Greerson Greene Mcmullen's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Greerson Greene Mcmullen has lived as well as Greerson Greene Mcmullen's phone numbers and email addresses.




Greerson Greene Mcmullen Has Lived in 8 States
Georgia Address for Greerson Greene Mcmullen


3410 A******** R* N* 

Atlanta, GA


Has Lived In

Atlanta, GA
Keswick, VA


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Greerson Greene Mcmullen

(678) ***-****
(202) ***-**** - Washington, DC 
(251) ***-**** - Mobile, AL 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Greerson Greene Mcmullen

g*******n@***.com
g*******n@***.com
g***************n@***.com


Get Email Report




Greerson Greene Mcmullen's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Greerson Greene Mcmullen's academic history.  Find out which schools Greerson Greene Mcmullen attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Greerson Greene Mcmullen received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Greerson Greene Mcmullen Has Attended 4 Schools
University of Virgina - School of Law 1985 – 1988               Greerson Greene Mcmullen has a Jd in Law               
University of Virgina - School of Law               1985 – 1988               Greerson Greene Mcmullen has a Jd, Law in Law               
Georgetown University - School of Foriegn Service               1980 – 1983               Greerson Greene Mcmullen has a BSFS in International Politics               
Georgetown University - School of Foriegn Service               1980 – 1983               Greerson Greene Mcmullen has a Bsfs, International Politics in International Politics               


Greerson Greene Mcmullen's Professional Information
Information regarding Greerson Greene Mcmullen's professional history.  Find out previous places Greerson Greene Mcmullen has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Greerson Greene Mcmullen Has Worked at 17 Places
Company: The ServiceMaster Company
               Title: Senior Vice President, Legal
Company: The ServiceMaster Company
               Title: Senior Vice President and General Counsel
Greerson Greene Mcmullen's Experience
Title: Senior Vice President, Legal
               Company: The ServiceMaster Company
Job Details
               Company Size: $1 mil to less than $5 mil - Employee Range: 100 to less than 500
Title: Senior Vice President and General Counsel
               Company: The ServiceMaster Company
Job Details
               Company Size: $1 bil and above - Employee Range: 5,000 to less than 25,000
Additional Professional Information on Greerson Greene Mcmullen

 See Greerson Greene Mcmullen's LinkedIn Profile



Greerson Greene Mcmullen's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Greerson Greene Mcmullen


Greerson Greene Mcmullen's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Greerson Greene Mcmullen's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Greerson McMullen
Username Matches

                  GreersonMcMullen
                  McMullenGreerson
                  Greerson.McMullen
                  McMullen.Greerson
                  Greerson_McMullen
                  McMullen_Greerson
                  Greerson-McMullen
                  McMullen-Greerson
                  GMcMullen
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
G McMullen







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.


















CA Inc. (NASDAQ:CA) Shares Sold by NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V. | Daily Political











































































Home
About/Contact
Columnists
Privacy Policy
























Headlines
Politics
Nation
World
Issues
Economy
Finance




















CA Inc. - Get News & Ratings Daily

		Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for CA Inc. with our FREE daily email newsletter:



 






Follow DailyPolitical

 
 










Latest News



Prospera Financial Services Inc Buys 543 Shares of Annaly Capital Management Inc (NLY)					

Prospera Financial Services Inc Decreases Stake in Vodafone Group PLC (VOD)					

Cooper Tire & Rubber Company (CTB) Position Boosted by Anderson Hoagland & Co.					

eBay Inc. (NASDAQ:EBAY) PT Raised to $40.00 at Benchmark Co.					

Sealed Air Corporation (SEE) Stake Maintained by Karpas Strategies LLC					

Union Bankshares Corporation (NASDAQ:UBSH) Announces $0.20 Quarterly Dividend					

Farmland Partners Inc. (FPI) Announces Quarterly Dividend of $0.13					

New York Mortgage Trust, Inc. (NYMT) Position Boosted by Prospera Financial Services Inc					

Lakeland Bancorp, Inc. (NASDAQ:LBAI) Posts  Earnings Results, Beats Expectations By $0.02 EPS					

ClubCorp Holdings, Inc. (MYCC) Announces  Earnings Results					

Truxton Corp. (TRUX) Issues  Earnings Results					

QCR Holdings, Inc. (NASDAQ:QCRH) Issues  Earnings Results, Misses Estimates By $0.01 EPS					

Equities Analysts Issue Forecasts for Editas Medicine, Inc.’s FY2017 Earnings (EDIT)					

Becton, Dickinson and Company (BDX) Forecasted to Post FY2017 Earnings of $9.43 Per Share					

Brokers Issue Forecasts for AC Immune  SA’s FY2017 Earnings (ACIU)					

CRISPR THERAPTC (CRSP) Given “Market Perform” Rating by Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc. Analysts					

Brokers Issue Forecasts for Synaptics Incorporated’s FY2017 Earnings (SYNA)					

Casella Waste Systems, Inc. (NASDAQ:CWST) Rating Reiterated by Stifel Nicolaus					

Needham & Company LLC Reiterates Buy Rating for Dermira, Inc. (DERM)					

FBR & Co Reiterates Mkt Perform Rating for Dorman Products, Inc. (DORM)					





 





						CA Inc. (NASDAQ:CA) Shares Sold by NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V.					

						 July 13th, 2017  - 0 comments - Filed Under -
 by Stacy Sanders 


							Filed Under: Finance - SEC Filing Articles 







Tweet










NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V. cut its stake in  CA Inc. (NASDAQ:CA) by 4.9% during the second quarter, Holdings Channel reports. The institutional investor  owned 748,142 shares of the technology company’s stock after selling 38,953 shares during the period. NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V.’s holdings in CA were worth $25,790,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
A number of other institutional investors have also recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Vanguard Group Inc. increased its stake in  CA by 27.8% in the first quarter. Vanguard Group Inc. now owns 26,311,643 shares of the technology company’s stock valued at $834,606,000 after buying an additional 5,729,276 shares during the last quarter.  Bank of New York Mellon Corp increased its stake in  CA by 2.3% in the first quarter. Bank of New York Mellon Corp now owns 24,311,915 shares of the technology company’s stock valued at $771,175,000 after buying an additional 546,030 shares during the last quarter.  Macquarie Group Ltd. increased its stake in  CA by 2.1% in the first quarter. Macquarie Group Ltd. now owns 23,725,398 shares of the technology company’s stock valued at $752,570,000 after buying an additional 479,924 shares during the last quarter.  BlackRock Inc. increased its stake in  CA by 2,711.1% in the first quarter. BlackRock Inc. now owns 20,716,899 shares of the technology company’s stock valued at $657,139,000 after buying an additional 19,979,935 shares during the last quarter.  Finally, Bank of America Corp DE increased its stake in  CA by 1.0% in the first quarter. Bank of America Corp DE now owns 15,719,102 shares of the technology company’s stock valued at $498,611,000 after buying an additional 154,092 shares during the last quarter. 70.63% of the stock is currently owned by institutional investors and hedge funds. 
CA Inc. (CA) opened at 34.32 on Thursday. The firm has a market capitalization of $14.34 billion, a P/E ratio of 18.55 and a beta of 0.87. The company’s 50-day moving average is $32.41 and its 200-day moving average is $32.25. CA Inc. has a 52-week low of $30.01 and a 52-week high of $36.54. 




CA (NASDAQ:CA) last issued its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, May 11th. The technology company reported $0.54 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the Zacks’ consensus estimate of $0.49 by $0.05. The firm had revenue of $1.01 billion during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $996.59 million. CA had a net margin of 19.20% and a return on equity of 17.15%. CA’s quarterly revenue was up .3% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same quarter in the prior year, the business earned $0.60 EPS.  On average, analysts predict that  CA Inc. will post $2.38 EPS for the current year. 
The firm also recently declared a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Tuesday, June 13th. Investors of record on Thursday, May 25th were paid a dividend of $0.255 per share. This represents a $1.02 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 2.97%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend  was Tuesday, May 23rd. CA’s dividend payout ratio  is currently 55.14%. 
TRADEMARK VIOLATION WARNING: “CA Inc. (NASDAQ:CA) Shares Sold by NN Investment Partners Holdings N.V.” was first  reported by Daily Political and is the property of of Daily Political. If you are accessing this piece on another website, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of United States & international copyright & trademark law. The original version of this piece can be accessed at https://www.dailypolitical.com/2017/07/13/ca-inc-nasdaqca-shares-sold-by-nn-investment-partners-holdings-n-v.html. 
CA has been the subject of several research reports. Jefferies Group LLC  reiterated a “buy” rating and set a $38.00 price objective on shares of CA in a research note on Wednesday, June 21st. Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of CA from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a research note on Tuesday, March 28th. Oppenheimer Holdings, Inc.  reiterated a “market perform” rating on shares of CA in a research note on Friday, May 12th. Raymond James Financial, Inc.  reiterated a “market perform” rating on shares of CA in a research note on Thursday, June 22nd. Finally, Citigroup Inc.  reiterated a “neutral” rating and set a $34.00 price objective (up from $33.00) on shares of CA in a research note on Sunday, May 14th. Four investment analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, nine have given a hold rating and five have assigned  a buy rating to the stock. CA  has an average rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $35.02.
In related news, insider Ayman Sayed sold 30,194 shares of the stock in a transaction on Wednesday, June 21st. The shares were sold at an average price of $35.62, for a total transaction of $1,075,510.28. Following the completion of the sale, the insider now owns 168,455 shares in the company, valued at approximately $6,000,367.10. The sale was disclosed in a document filed with the SEC, which can be accessed through the SEC website. 0.90% of the stock is owned by corporate insiders. 
CA Company Profile
CA, Inc (CA) is engaged in providing software solutions enabling customers to plan, develop, manage and secure applications and enterprise environments across distributed, cloud, mobile and mainframe platforms. The Company operates through three business segments: Mainframe Solutions, Enterprise Solutions and Services.
Want to see what other hedge funds are holding CA? Visit HoldingsChannel.com to get the latest 13F filings and insider trades for CA Inc. (NASDAQ:CA).






Receive News & Ratings for CA Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for CA Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 
















 Comment on this Post

Click here to cancel reply.



Name (required)

Mail (will not be published) (required)

Website






Wordpress Hashcash needs javascript to work, but your browser has javascript disabled. Your comment will be placed in moderation!




Latest News




Jeff Sessions Spoke of Resigning After Tensions Increase with Trump





President Trump’s Tweets Complicate Already Complicated Week





World Leaders Very Critical of Paris Agreement Decision by Trump





Aide to President Trump Resigns With More Expected





Scud-Class Missile Launched by North Korea














			© DailyPolitical, LLC 2009-2017. All rights reserved. 


Privacy Policy |
			About | Columnists 
			| Contact 
































































     McMullen Greerson Greene
        – Filings and Transcripts
    – BamSEC


































Toggle navigation

















                                Product 


Features
Product Details
Help Center
Pricing


Contact

Log In


Free Trial








            McMullen Greerson Greene
        


 Watch 








Warning: Large portions of this site require JavaScript enabled in order to function properly. Please make sure JavaScript is enabled in your browser.
Please let us know at support@bamsec.com if you have any questions or concerns.





 Categorized
            

 Chronological
            

 Ownership by Owner
            

 Transcripts
            

 Your Highlights
            

Search in Documents









Key Exhibits

Articles of Inc. & Bylaws
Credit Agreements
Indentures
Material Contracts
Plans of Reorganization
Underwriting Agreements

External Links



                    SEC EDGAR
                    







Financials 

No filings in this category.

Prospectuses and Registrations 

No filings in this category.

Ownership         

Filter












            4
        

            Coty Inc.
        

                        06/16/17

        




            4
        

            Coty Inc.
        

                        05/30/17

        




            4
        

            Coty Inc.
        

                        05/25/17

        




            4
        

            Coty Inc.
        

                        03/16/17

        




            4
        

            Coty Inc.
        

                        02/14/17

        




            4
        

            #### ####
        

                        11/23/16

        




            4
        

            #### ####
        

                        11/14/16

        









News 

No filings in this category.

Proxies 

No filings in this category.

Other 

No filings in this category.



See an issue? Let us know.







×
Report an Issue




What is the issue?



Your email

Optional. Fill in if you would like to receive a reply from us.




Cancel
Report Issue










×
Report Submitted


Thank you for reporting the issue. If you have provided an email address, we will be in touch shortly.



Close









×
Report Not Submitted


Sorry, your submission did not go through. This could be due to a network error or, if you are at an investment bank, your company disallowing issue report submissions.



Cancel
Try again?










Free Trial


Features


© 2017 BamSEC, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Browse













﻿

























Coty (COTY) versus Elizabeth Arden (RDEN) Head-To-Head Contrast - BNB Daily





































 
















 

 













Daily Ratings & News for Coty Inc.
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Coty Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Ulta Beauty (ULTA) Earns News Impact Rating of 0.28
ProAssurance Corporation (PRA) Insider Sells $297,466.40 in Stock
Tallgrass Energy Partners, (TEP) Earns Daily Media Sentiment Rating of 0.27
Inovio Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ:INO) Receives $21.01 Consensus PT from Brokerages
Zacks: Brokerages Expect W.W. Grainger, Inc. (NYSE:GWW) Will Post Earnings of $2.61 Per Share
Brokerages Set Globant S.A. (GLOB) Price Target at $42.42
BT Group plc (BT.A) – Investment Analysts’ Recent Ratings Updates
Philip D. Gregory Sells 2,250 Shares of bluebird bio, Inc. (BLUE) Stock
TCF Financial Corporation (TCF) Given Average Rating of “Hold” by Brokerages
BeiGene, Ltd. (NASDAQ:BGNE) CEO Sells $14,221,508.00 in Stock
-$1.63 Earnings Per Share Expected for bluebird bio, Inc. (BLUE) This Quarter
Jefferies Group LLC Reaffirms Buy Rating for Arch Coal, Inc. Class A (NASDAQ:ARCH)
Bank of America Corporation’s (NYSE:BAC) “Buy” Rating Reiterated at Buckingham Research
Comerica Bank Sells 131 Shares of Sprint Corporation (S)
Church & Dwight Company, Inc. (CHD) Price Target Increased to $53.00 by Analysts at Bank of America Corporation
Amphastar Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ:AMPH) Shares Bought by Bank of New York Mellon Corp
Bank of New York Mellon Corp Sells 20,785 Shares of Armstrong World Industries Inc (NYSE:AWI)
Bank of New York Mellon Corp Acquires 6,650 Shares of TriCo Bancshares (TCBK)
Positive Media Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Affect Credit Suisse Group (NYSE:CS) Stock Price
Carlisle Companies (CSL) Earning Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage, Study Finds


 


Coty (COTY) versus Elizabeth Arden (RDEN) Head-To-Head Contrast

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 20th, 2017 // No Comments 

Coty (NYSE: COTY) and Elizabeth Arden (NASDAQ:RDEN) are both consumer staples companies, but which is the better business? We will contrast the two companies based on the strength of their valuation, earnings, analyst recommendations, institutional ownership, dividends, profitabiliy and risk. 
Institutional & Insider Ownership




66.3% of Coty shares are owned by institutional investors. Comparatively, 70.7% of Elizabeth Arden shares are owned by institutional investors. 16.1% of Coty shares are owned by company insiders. Comparatively, 15.2% of Elizabeth Arden shares are owned by company insiders. Strong institutional ownership is an indication that hedge funds, large money managers and endowments believe a stock is poised for long-term growth.


 Get Coty Inc. alerts:



Analyst Recommendations
This is a breakdown of recent ratings and target prices for Coty and Elizabeth Arden, as provided by MarketBeat. 



Sell Ratings
Hold Ratings
Buy Ratings
Strong Buy Ratings
Rating Score


Coty
2
8
5
0
2.20


Elizabeth Arden
0
1
0
0
2.00


Coty currently has a consensus target price of $22.89, suggesting a potential upside of 22.42%. Elizabeth Arden has a consensus target price of $14.00, suggesting a potential upside of 0.07%. Given Coty’s stronger consensus rating and higher possible upside, equities analysts plainly believe Coty is more favorable than Elizabeth Arden.
Dividends
Coty pays an annual dividend of $0.50 per share and has a dividend yield of 2.7%. Elizabeth Arden does not pay a dividend. Coty pays out -200.0% of its earnings in the form of a dividend. Coty has raised its dividend for 2 consecutive years. 
Earnings & Valuation
This table compares Coty and Elizabeth Arden’s gross revenue, earnings per share and valuation.



Gross Revenue
Price/Sales Ratio
EBITDA
Earnings Per Share
Price/Earnings Ratio


Coty
$6.48 billion
2.16
$991.00 million
($0.25)
-74.80


Elizabeth Arden
N/A
N/A
N/A
($2.49)
-5.62


Coty has higher revenue and earnings than Elizabeth Arden. Coty is trading at a lower price-to-earnings ratio than Elizabeth Arden, indicating that it is currently the more affordable of the two stocks. 
Volatility & Risk
Coty has a beta of 0.28, suggesting that its stock price is 72% less volatile than the S&P 500. Comparatively, Elizabeth Arden has a beta of 1.35, suggesting that its stock price is 35% more volatile than the S&P 500. 
Profitability
This table compares Coty and Elizabeth Arden’s net margins, return on equity and return on assets.



Net Margins
Return on Equity
Return on Assets


Coty
-2.29%
9.12%
3.10%


Elizabeth Arden
-11.89%
-135.03%
-11.66%


Summary
Coty beats Elizabeth Arden on 12 of the 14 factors compared between the two stocks.
About Coty
Coty Inc. is a beauty company. The Company operates through four segments: Fragrances, Color Cosmetics, Skin & Body Care and Brazil Acquisition. Its fragrance products include a range of men’s and women’s products. Its fragrance brands include Calvin Klein, Marc Jacobs, Davidoff, Chloe, Balenciaga, Beyonce, Bottega Veneta, Miu Miu and Roberto Cavalli. Its color cosmetics products include lip, eye, nail and facial color products. The brands in its Color Cosmetics segment include Bourjois, Rimmel, Sally Hansen and OPI. Its skin & body care products include shower gels, deodorants, skin care and sun treatment products. Its skin & body care brands are adidas, Lancaster, philosophy and Playboy. The Company, through Hypermarcas S.A., engages in personal care and beauty business. The Brazil Acquisition segment includes product groupings, such as skin care, nail care, deodorants and hair care products. It operates in the Americas; Europe, the Middle East and Africa (EMEA), and Asia Pacific.
About Elizabeth Arden
Elizabeth Arden, Inc. is a global beauty products company with a portfolio of fragrance, skin care and cosmetics brands. The Company’s segments include North America and International. The Company’s North America segment sells its portfolio of owned, licensed and distributed brands, including the Elizabeth Arden products, to retailers, mass retailers and distributors in the United States, Canada and Puerto Rico, and also includes its direct to consumer business, which consists of its Elizabeth Arden branded retail outlet stores and its e-commerce business in North America. The Company’s North America segment also sells Elizabeth Arden products through the Red Door Spa beauty salons and spas. The Company’s International segment sells its portfolio of owned and licensed brands, including its Elizabeth Arden products, to perfumeries, boutiques, department stores, travel retail outlets and distributors in approximately 120 countries outside of North America. 
 
Receive News & Ratings for Coty Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Coty Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





















Latest News




Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name (Required) 



Mail (will not be published) (Required) 



Website






 















































Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage Very Likely to Impact HealthSouth Corp (HLS) Share Price - BNB Daily












 
















 

 

Home » Investing



Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage Very Likely to Impact HealthSouth Corp (HLS) Share Price

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about HealthSouth Corp (NYSE:HLS) has trended somewhat positive this week, Accern Sentiment Analysis reports. The research group scores the sentiment of news coverage by reviewing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Foster Wheeler AG (NASDAQ:FWLT) Given Daily Media Impact Score of 0.27

Posted by Tim Parker on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Press coverage about Foster Wheeler AG (NASDAQ:FWLT) has trended positive this week, Accern Sentiment reports. Accern identifies negative and positive media coverage by analyzing more than 20 million blog and news sources in real-time....  




Federal Signal Corporation (NYSE:FSS) Receiving Favorable Press Coverage, Report Finds

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media coverage about Federal Signal Corporation (NYSE:FSS) has been trending positive this week, Accern reports. The research group identifies negative and positive news coverage by analyzing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Ford Motor (F) Getting Somewhat Favorable Press Coverage, Study Shows

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media headlines about Ford Motor (NYSE:F) have been trending somewhat positive on Thursday, according to Accern Sentiment. The research group scores the sentiment of media coverage by monitoring more than 20 million news and blog sources...  




Gentex Corporation (NASDAQ:GNTX) Receives Media Impact Score of 0.14

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News headlines about Gentex Corporation (NASDAQ:GNTX) have trended somewhat positive this week, Accern Sentiment reports. The research firm identifies positive and negative media coverage by reviewing more than 20 million blog and...  




Genesis Energy, L.P. (GEL) Given Daily Coverage Optimism Score of 0.07

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Media coverage about Genesis Energy, L.P. (NYSE:GEL) has been trending somewhat positive this week, Accern reports. The research group identifies negative and positive news coverage by analyzing more than twenty million news and blog...  




Favorable News Coverage Likely to Impact GlaxoSmithKline PLC (NYSE:GSK) Share Price

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about GlaxoSmithKline PLC (NYSE:GSK) has been trending positive on Thursday, Accern Sentiment reports. Accern ranks the sentiment of news coverage by analyzing more than 20 million news and blog sources. Accern ranks...  




Newmont Mining Corporation (NEM) Upgraded to “Outperform” at Scotiabank

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Newmont Mining Corporation (NYSE:NEM) was upgraded by stock analysts at Scotiabank from a “sector perform” rating to an “outperform” rating in a report released on Wednesday, July 5th. The brokerage presently...  




Kohl’s Corporation (KSS) Upgraded by BidaskClub to Hold

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Kohl’s Corporation (NYSE:KSS) was upgraded by stock analysts at BidaskClub from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Wednesday, July 5th.
A number of other brokerages have...  




Marathon Oil Corporation (NYSE:MRO) Upgraded to “Buy” by Citigroup Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Citigroup Inc. upgraded shares of Marathon Oil Corporation (NYSE:MRO) from a neutral rating to a buy rating in a research note released on Wednesday, July 5th, MarketBeat.com reports. The brokerage currently has $15.00 price objective...  




AG Mortgage Investment Trust, Inc. (NYSE:MITT) Stock Rating Lowered by Zacks Investment Research

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

AG Mortgage Investment Trust, Inc. (NYSE:MITT) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “sell” rating in a report issued on Wednesday, July 5th.
According to Zacks, “AG Mortgage...  




Archer-Daniels-Midland Company (ADM) Receives “Hold” Rating from BMO Capital Markets

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Archer-Daniels-Midland Company (NYSE:ADM)‘s stock had its “hold” rating reiterated by analysts at BMO Capital Markets in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, June 27th. They currently have a $41.00 price objective...  




Zacks Investment Research Lowers Guidance Software, Inc. (NASDAQ:GUID) to Hold

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Guidance Software, Inc. (NASDAQ:GUID) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, July 4th.
According to Zacks, “GUIDANCE...  




Black Box Corporation (BBOX) Rating Increased to Buy at Sidoti

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Sidoti upgraded shares of Black Box Corporation (NASDAQ:BBOX) from a neutral rating to a buy rating in a research note published on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat Ratings reports. Sidoti currently has $10.00 price objective on the...  




Mizuho Lowers Jazz Pharmaceuticals PLC (NASDAQ:JAZZ) to Neutral

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Mizuho downgraded shares of Jazz Pharmaceuticals PLC (NASDAQ:JAZZ) from a buy rating to a neutral rating in a research note published on Tuesday, July 4th, StockTargetPrices.com reports. Mizuho currently has $150.00 price objective...  




Harmonic Inc. (NASDAQ:HLIT) Upgraded to “Hold” by Zacks Investment Research

Posted by David Goldstein on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Harmonic Inc. (NASDAQ:HLIT) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “strong sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, July 4th.
According to Zacks, “Harmonic designs,...  




Alphabet Inc. (GOOGL) Receives “Buy” Rating from Cantor Fitzgerald

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Cantor Fitzgerald restated their buy rating on shares of Alphabet Inc. (NASDAQ:GOOGL) in a research note published on Tuesday, June 27th, Marketbeat Ratings reports. Cantor Fitzgerald currently has a $1,070.00 price objective on the...  




Sysco Corporation’s (SYY) “Buy” Rating Reiterated at BMO Capital Markets

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Sysco Corporation (NYSE:SYY)‘s stock had its “buy” rating reiterated by analysts at BMO Capital Markets in a note issued to investors on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat Ratings reports. They currently have a $60.00...  




Somewhat Positive Media Coverage Very Likely to Impact Praxair (PX) Share Price

Posted by Stefani Robinson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

News coverage about Praxair (NYSE:PX) has trended somewhat positive on Thursday, according to Accern Sentiment. Accern identifies negative and positive press coverage by analyzing more than 20 million blog and news sources in real-time....  




LyondellBasell Industries NV (LYB) Given Consensus Rating of “Hold” by Analysts

Posted by Toi Williams on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Shares of LyondellBasell Industries NV (NYSE:LYB) have received an average recommendation of “Hold” from the twenty-one research firms that are currently covering the firm, Marketbeat Ratings reports. One research analyst...  




Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (NYSE:FMX) Given Consensus Rating of “Buy” by Brokerages

Posted by Renee Johnson on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Fomento Economico Mexicano S.A.B. de C.V. (NYSE:FMX) has been assigned a consensus recommendation of “Buy” from the seven ratings firms that are covering the company, MarketBeat reports. One analyst has rated the stock...  




Rice Energy Inc. (RICE) Rating Lowered to Hold at KLR Group

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

KLR Group lowered shares of Rice Energy Inc. (NYSE:RICE) from a buy rating to a hold rating in a research report report published on Tuesday, June 27th, MarketBeat reports. They currently have $27.00 price target on the oil and gas...  




$0.39 Earnings Per Share Expected for Axalta Coating Systems Ltd (NASDAQ:AXTA) This Quarter

Posted by Vince Mercandetti on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Wall Street brokerages forecast that Axalta Coating Systems Ltd (NASDAQ:AXTA) will announce earnings per share of $0.39 for the current quarter, according to Zacks Investment Research. Four analysts have provided estimates for Axalta...  




Eagle Materials Inc (EXP) Expected to Post Earnings of $1.17 Per Share

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Equities analysts expect Eagle Materials Inc (NYSE:EXP) to report earnings of $1.17 per share for the current fiscal quarter, Zacks Investment Research reports. Two analysts have provided estimates for Eagle Materials’ earnings,...  




Marathon Patent Group (NASDAQ:MARA) and Advanced Disposal Services (ADSW) Head to Head Analysis

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Marathon Patent Group (NASDAQ: MARA) and Advanced Disposal Services (NASDAQ:ADSW) are both finance companies, but which is the superior investment? We will contrast the two companies based on the strength of their earnings, dividends,...  




Levin Capital Strategies L.P. Sells 669,521 Shares of Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (TMO)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Levin Capital Strategies L.P. cut its position in Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc (NYSE:TMO) by 91.5% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 62,473...  




Phillips 66 (PSX) Shares Sold by South State Corp

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

South State Corp cut its position in Phillips 66 (NYSE:PSX) by 19.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 49,006 shares of the oil and gas company’s...  




Mirae Asset Global Investments Co. Ltd. Sells 7,102 Shares of Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) (GS)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Mirae Asset Global Investments Co. Ltd. decreased its position in shares of Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) (NYSE:GS) by 19.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the SEC. The institutional...  




General Mills, Inc. (GIS) Stake Increased by Blue Chip Partners Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Blue Chip Partners Inc. raised its position in General Mills, Inc. (NYSE:GIS) by 3.6% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 16,110 shares...  




Caterpillar, Inc. (CAT) Position Maintained by Pettee Investors Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Pettee Investors Inc. continued to hold its position in shares of Caterpillar, Inc. (NYSE:CAT) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 2,332 shares...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.25 Million Stake in Imperial Oil Ltd (IMO)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC increased its position in shares of Imperial Oil Ltd (NYSEMKT:IMO) (TSE:IMO) by 4.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission...  




Citigroup Inc. (C) Stake Decreased by NEXT Financial Group Inc

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

NEXT Financial Group Inc reduced its position in shares of Citigroup Inc. (NYSE:C) by 31.0% during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the SEC. The institutional investor owned 14,080 shares of the financial...  




Essex Financial Services Inc. Has $261,000 Position in FedEx Corporation (FDX)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Essex Financial Services Inc. increased its stake in FedEx Corporation (NYSE:FDX) by 14.8% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the SEC. The fund owned 1,335 shares of the shipping service provider’s...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.28 Million Stake in W.R. Grace & Co. (GRA)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC raised its stake in shares of W.R. Grace & Co. (NYSE:GRA) by 30.2% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC)....  




Omnia Family Wealth LLC Maintains Position in Medtronic PLC (MDT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Omnia Family Wealth LLC continued to hold its stake in shares of Medtronic PLC (NYSE:MDT) during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The firm owned 3,836 shares of...  




Eagle Asset Management Inc. Cuts Position in Medtronic PLC (MDT)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Eagle Asset Management Inc. lowered its stake in shares of Medtronic PLC (NYSE:MDT) by 11.6% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned...  




Warren Averett Asset Management LLC Takes Position in Duke Energy Corporation (DUK)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Warren Averett Asset Management LLC bought a new stake in shares of Duke Energy Corporation (NYSE:DUK) during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The institutional...  




Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC Has $3.33 Million Stake in BancorpSouth, Inc. (BXS)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Parametric Portfolio Associates LLC raised its stake in shares of BancorpSouth, Inc. (NYSE:BXS) by 4.3% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The...  




HubSpot, Inc. (HUBS) Shares Bought by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. increased its position in shares of HubSpot, Inc. (NYSE:HUBS) by 1.7% during the first quarter, according to its most recent 13F filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The firm owned 75,500...  




Kulicke and Soffa Industries, Inc. (KLIC) Earns “Buy” Rating from B. Riley

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

B. Riley reaffirmed their buy rating on shares of Kulicke and Soffa Industries, Inc. (NASDAQ:KLIC) in a report released on Thursday, June 29th. B. Riley currently has a $31.00 price target on the semiconductor company’s stock.
A...  




VCA Inc. (WOOF) Lifted to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

VCA Inc. (NASDAQ:WOOF) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a report issued on Thursday, June 29th.
According to Zacks, “VCA Inc. is a national animal healthcare...  




Cray Inc (CRAY) Shares Bought by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. raised its position in shares of Cray Inc (NASDAQ:CRAY) by 4.8% during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC). The fund owned 212,960...  




149,273 Shares in Premier, Inc. (PINC) Acquired by Ameriprise Financial Inc.

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ameriprise Financial Inc. acquired a new position in Premier, Inc. (NASDAQ:PINC) during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The fund acquired 149,273 shares of the...  




Cypress Semiconductor Corporation (CY) Raised to “Buy” at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Cypress Semiconductor Corporation (NASDAQ:CY) was upgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating in a report issued on Thursday, June 29th. The brokerage presently has a $15.00...  




Intertek Group plc (ITRK) Downgraded to Neutral at Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The)

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Intertek Group plc (LON:ITRK) was downgraded by research analysts at Goldman Sachs Group, Inc. (The) to a “neutral” rating in a note issued to investors on Monday, July 3rd, Marketbeat reports. They currently have a GBX...  




Beaufort Securities Downgrades Fox Marble Holdings PLC (FOX) to Hold

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Beaufort Securities downgraded shares of Fox Marble Holdings PLC (LON:FOX) to a hold rating in a research report sent to investors on Monday, July 3rd.
Shares of Fox Marble Holdings PLC (LON:FOX) traded up 0.000% on Monday, hitting...  




VASCO Data Security International, Inc. (VDSI) Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Research

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

VASCO Data Security International, Inc. (NASDAQ:VDSI) was downgraded by Zacks Investment Research from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report issued to clients and investors on Thursday, June...  




General Mills, Inc. (GIS) Earns “Equal Weight” Rating from Morgan Stanley

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Morgan Stanley restated their equal weight rating on shares of General Mills, Inc. (NYSE:GIS) in a research report sent to investors on Sunday, June 25th. Morgan Stanley currently has a $55.00 price target on the stock, down from...  




Ball Co. (NYSE:BLL) Rating Reiterated by Jefferies Group LLC

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Ball Co. (NYSE:BLL)‘s stock had its “buy” rating restated by analysts at Jefferies Group LLC in a research note issued to investors on Sunday, June 25th. They presently have a $47.00 price objective on the industrial...  




$7.06 Billion in Sales Expected for Philip Morris International Inc (PM) This Quarter

Posted by Dan Jones on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 

Brokerages expect Philip Morris International Inc (NYSE:PM) to post $7.06 billion in sales for the current fiscal quarter, Zacks Investment Research reports. Two analysts have provided estimates for Philip Morris International’s...  


Next » 














Free Email Newsletter
Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor your stocks with our free daily email newsletter:



 




Follow @bnbdailynews





Recent Posts

Thermo Fisher Scientific (TMO) Receiving Somewhat Favorable News Coverage, Analysis Shows
Teva Pharmaceutical Industries Limited (TEVA) Receives Daily Media Sentiment Rating of 0.41
PNC Financial Services Group, Inc. (The) (PNC) Position Raised by Delta Lloyd NV
Rogers Corporation (ROG) Position Cut by Prudential Financial Inc.
TJX Companies, Inc. (The) (TJX) Shares Bought by Mason Street Advisors LLC
Becton, Dickinson and Company (BDX) Position Raised by Wealthsource Partners LLC
Nordea Investment Management AB Sells 889,163 Shares of Stryker Corporation (SYK)
Orbotech Ltd. (ORBK) Shares Bought by Envestnet Asset Management Inc.
Envestnet Asset Management Inc. Sells 11 Shares of Cubic Corporation (CUB)
Envestnet Asset Management Inc. Acquires 2,349 Shares of Vipshop Holdings Limited (VIPS)
Premier Asset Managment LLC Has $369,000 Position in Accenture PLC (ACN)
Allergan PLC. (AGN) Shares Sold by Mayo Investment Advisers LLC
Select Medical Holdings Corporation (SEM) Shares Bought by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Bemis Company, Inc. (BMS) Shares Sold by JPMorgan Chase & Co.
Prudential Financial Inc. Acquires 72 Shares of ESCO Technologies Inc. (ESE)
Prudential Financial Inc. Sells 1,732 Shares of Woodward, Inc. (WWD)
JPMorgan Chase & Co. Acquires 249,725 Shares of Enbridge Energy Management LLC (EEQ)
USS Investment Management Ltd Has $22,858,000 Position in General Dynamics Corporation (GD)
Acceleron Pharma Inc. (XLRN) SVP Sells $29,984.00 in Stock
GTT Communications, Inc. (NYSE:GTT) Expected to Post Earnings of -$0.03 Per Share


 






















Greerson Mcmullen - Attorney in Atlanta, GA - Lawyer.com























Ask A Lawyer
Tell Us Your Case Information for Fastest Lawyer Match!








                    Please include all relevant details from your case including where, when, and who it involves.                                          
                    Case details that can effectively describe the legal situation while also staying concise generally receive the best responses from lawyers.
                




Briefly Describe Your Case:









Your Contact Info:


name



Cell Phone Number



Email





Your Case Location:

zip





By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                            Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                            Terms of Use, and 
                             Privacy Policy. Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                            
















GeorgiaAtlantaGreerson Mcmullen


Greerson Greene Mcmullen








Greerson Greene Mcmullen 
                                    



General Practice




Law School:

U of Virginia  



Status:
Inactive


Licensed:
9 years














675-1 West Paces Ferry Rd, Nw
30327
Atlanta
GA









                                Profile LAWPOINTS™9/100
                            



                        No Misconduct Found✓


                        Reviews Pro Bono Cases✓


Upgrade to a premium listing


Update your listing




LAWYERID™Not Available





















                    Contact Mcmullen















Briefly Describe Your Case:










Your Contact Info:








Your Case Location:



  FREE: Also send inquiry to other qualified local Lawyers.











                By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                Terms of Use, and 
                 Privacy Policy.  Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                



                                                  Submit
                                                










×Close
Would you like us to contact more lawyers?



Click below to submit your inquiry to more local lawyers (for free!).Save time, get options, and find the perfect match!

Send to Local Lawyers
No, Thanks, I only want Greerson Greene Mcmullen .









TOP LOCAL LAWYERS










Jamie G. Miller
Federal Trial Practice, Labor Law, Employment, Personal Injury, Business
Atlanta, GA 30305 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




David Alan Garfinkel
Divorce & Family Law, Divorce, Family Law, Child Custody, Child Support
Atlanta, GA 30305 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Aaron N. Freedman
Criminal, DUI-DWI, Felony, Misdemeanor, Personal Injury
Atlanta, GA 30326 (Fulton County)





CONTACT








Bryce Angell
Personal Injury, Car Accident, Wrongful Death, Medical Malpractice, Slip & Fall Accident
Atlanta, GA 30326 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Kevin Ford
Accident & Injury, Personal Injury, Car Accident, Wrongful Death
Atlanta, GA 30305 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Timothy F. Coen
Accident & Injury, Lawsuit & Dispute
Atlanta, GA 30327 (Fulton County)





CONTACT








Glenn Eric Kushel
Accident & Injury, Medical Malpractice, Personal Injury, Wrongful Death, Car Accident
Atlanta, GA 30326 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Neil Richard Flit
Car Accident, Personal Injury, Slip & Fall Accident, Wrongful Death
Atlanta, GA 30326 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Michael Weinstein
Accident & Injury, Car Accident, Wrongful Death, Divorce & Family Law, Criminal
Atlanta, GA 30342 (Fulton County)





CONTACT








Matt Berry
Divorce, Bankruptcy, Social Security, Car Accident, Family Law
Atlanta, GA 30324 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




David Michael Zagoria
Accident & Injury, Car Accident, Animal Bite, Wrongful Death, Medical Malpractice
Atlanta, GA 30329 (Dekalb County)





CONTACT




R. Craig Thrift
Timeshare, Real Estate, Merger & Acquisition, Franchising
Atlanta, GA 30363 (Fulton County)





CONTACT











Education






School
Degree
Major
Graduation




University of Virginia School of Law

Law School
N/A






Admission






State / Court
Date




Tennessee
2009






Additional Info



Service Type:General


Update Date:2016-06-22




Lawyer Badges


















33.848821,-84.409459













MAIN LOCATION


675-1 West Paces Ferry Rd, NwAtlanta, GA 30327




SAMPLE LEGAL CASES



President Trump States That He Would Stick With List of Potential Nominees for Future SCOTUS Vacancy

                    President Donald Trump told the Washington Times in an interview that in the event another Supreme Court seat opens, he would pick a nominee from his campaign list of potential nominees.
                




CLIENT APPRECIATION EVENT 2017 – MARK YOUR CALENDARS!

                    MARK YOUR CALENDARS!
                


















                                         
                                    








QuickSearch 
                                                            




near





                                                                            GO
                                                                        







Lawyer Search


Legal Protection Plan


For Lawyers



                                                    My Account



                                                    About Us










Broad Search:

Keyword:





Practice Area:


Please Select (optional)
Accident & Injury     All Accident & Injury     Animal Bite     Asbestos & Mesothelioma     Aviation Accident     Car Accident     Defamation & Slander     Malpractice     Medical Malpractice     Personal Injury     Products Liability     Property Damage     Railroad Injury     Slip & Fall Accident     Toxic Mold & Tort     Workers' Compensation     Wrongful DeathBankruptcy & Debt     All Bankruptcy & Debt     Bankruptcy     Collection     Credit & Debt     Reorganization     WorkoutBusiness     All Business     Administrative Law     Antitrust     Banking & Finance     Business Organization     Contract     Corporate     Insurance     Merger & Acquisition     SecuritiesCivil & Human Rights     All Civil & Human Rights     Civil Rights     Constitutional Law     Discrimination     Elder Law     Native PeopleConsumer Rights     All Consumer Rights     Consumer Protection     Identity TheftCriminal     All Criminal     DUI-DWI     Felony     Misdemeanor     RICO Act     Traffic     White Collar CrimeDivorce & Family Law     All Divorce & Family Law     Adoption     Child Custody     Child Support     Divorce     Family LawEmployment     All Employment     Employee Rights     Employment Contracts     Employment Discrimination     Family Medical Leave Act (FMLA)     Labor Law     Occupational Safety & Health     Pension & Benefits     Sexual Harassment     Whistleblower     Workers' Compensation     Wrongful TerminationEnvironmental Law     All Environmental Law     Natural Resources     Waste & Pollution     Environmental Law OtherEstate     All Estate     Estate Planning     Power of Attorney     Trusts     Wills & ProbateGovernment     All Government     Election & Political     Government Agencies     Government Contract     Legislative Practice     Permits     Public Interest Law     Social Security     State and Local     US Courts     WelfareHealth Care     All Health Care     Medical Products & Devices     Medicare & Medicaid     Pharmaceutical Product     Health Care OtherImmigration     All Immigration     Deportation     VisaIndustry Specialties     All Industry Specialties     Admiralty & Maritime     Advertising     Agriculture     Aviation     Communication & Media Law     Energy     Entertainment     Gaming & Alcohol     Oil & Gas     Science, Technology & Internet     Transportation & Shipping     Other IndustriesIntellectual Property     All Intellectual Property     Copyright     International Intellectual Property     Patent     TrademarkInternational     All International     Foreign Investment     International Tax     International Trade     International OtherLawsuit & Dispute     All Lawsuit & Dispute     Arbitration     Class Action     Dispute Resolution     Lawsuit     Litigation     MediationMotor Vehicle     All Motor Vehicle     Defect and Lemon Law     TrafficReal Estate     All Real Estate   Timeshare     Construction     Eminent Domain     Foreclosure     Land Use & Zoning     Landlord-Tenant     Real Estate OtherTax     All Tax     Corporate Tax     Income Tax     Sales & Use Tax     Tax LitigationOther     All Other     Education     Ethics     Juvenile Law     Military     Power of Attorney




Location:



                                                                             miles
                                                                            

Search









Advanced Search:





Lawyers
Law Firms
Practice Areas
International
Articles
Law Schools
Resources









Lawyer.com Legal Protection Plan

Prepaid legal service that can help youand your family save money withaffordable family legal insurance.
Unlimited 60-minute free consultations
Save 25% on legal fees
Up to $1 Million identity theft protectionand more!




 

See All Benefits
» Join Now







Premium Membership

For Lawyers
Benefits
Partner Discounts
Preferred Partners
Law Firms



Additional Services

LawyerLine™
LawSite Express
TopFirm Listings
AdWords Review
Jumpstart Package
SEO Review
Website Evaluation



Resources

Profile LawPoints
Sponsorships
Legal Articles
CLE Class
Seconds Count
International







My Account Details

Member Login Page
Forgot Password?
New user? Sign Up



Log in to Lawyer.com







Log in








Company Information
Lawyer.com Team
Company Culture
News & Press Releases




Contact Us
Lawyer FAQ
Testimonials




Privacy Policy
Settlement Blog
Legal Marketing Blog

























Georgia Lawyer - Lawyer.com


















Ask A Lawyer
Tell Us Your Case Information for Fastest Lawyer Match!






 
                              Please include all relevant details from your case including where, when, and who it involoves. Case details that can effectively describe the legal situation while also staying concise generally receive the best responses from lawyers.




Briefly Describe Your Case:









Your Contact Info:


name



Cell Phone Number



Email





Your Case Location:

zip





By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                                  Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                                  Terms of Use, and 
                                   Privacy Policy. Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                                




















Georgia Lawyer






                  Georgia Lawyer                





CITYCOUNTYView all Georgia  Lawyers or browse by county.Appling CountyBaxleySurrencyAtkinson CountyAxsonPearsonWillacoocheeBacon CountyAlmaBaker CountyNewtonBaldwin CountyHardwickMilledgevilleBanks CountyBaldwinCommerceHomerMaysvilleBarrow CountyAuburnBethlehemStathamWinderBartow CountyAdairsvilleCartersvilleCassvilleEmersonKingstonRydalTaylorsvilleWhiteBen Hill CountyFitzgeraldBerrien CountyAlapahaEnigmaNashvilleRay CityBibb CountyLizellaMaconBleckley CountyCochranBrantley CountyHobokenHortenseNahuntaWaynesvilleBrooks CountyBarneyBarwickDixieMorvenQuitmanBryan CountyEllabellPembrokeRichmond HillBulloch CountyBrookletPortalRegisterStatesboroBurke CountyGirardGoughKeysvilleMidvilleSardisWaynesboroButts CountyFlovillaJacksonJenkinsburgCalhoun CountyArlingtonEdisonLearyMorganCamden CountyKings BayKingslandSaint MarysWaverlyWhite OakWoodbineCandler CountyMetterPulaskiCarroll CountyBowdonBowdon JunctionCarrolltonMount ZionRoopvilleTempleVilla RicaWhitesburgCatoosa CountyFort OglethorpeGraysvilleRinggoldVarnellCharlton CountyFolkstonSaint GeorgeChatham CountyBloomingdalePoolerSavannahTybee IslandChattahoochee CountyCussetaChattooga CountyLyerlyMenloSummervilleTrionCherokee CountyAcworthBall GroundCantonHolly SpringsLebanonNelsonWaleskaWoodstockClarke CountyAthensWintervilleClay CountyBlufftonFort GainesClayton CountyConleyForest ParkJonesboroLovejoyMorrowRexRiverdaleClinch CountyArgyleDu PontFargoHomervilleCobb CountyAcworthAustellClarkdaleKennesawMabletonMariettaPowder SpringsSmyrnaCoffee CountyAmbroseBroxtonDouglasNichollsWest GreenColquitt CountyBerlinDoerunEllentonFunstonHartsfieldMoultrieNorman ParkColumbia CountyApplingAugustaEvansGrovetownHarlemCook CountyAdelCecilLenoxSparksCoweta CountyGrantvilleHaralsonMorelandNewnanSargentSenoiaSharpsburgSunny SideTurinCrawford CountyKnoxvilleMusellaRobertaCrisp CountyArabiCordeleDade CountyRising FawnTrentonWildwoodDawson CountyDawsonvilleDecatur CountyAttapulgusBainbridgeBrinsonClimaxFowlstownDekalb CountyAtlantaAvondale EstatesClarkstonDecaturEllenwoodLithoniaPine LakeRedanScottdaleStone MountainTuckerDodge CountyChaunceyChesterEastmanMilanRhineDooly CountyByromvilleLillyPinehurstUnadillaViennaDougherty CountyAlbanyPutneyDouglas CountyDouglasvilleLithia SpringsWinstonEarly CountyBlakelyCedar SpringsDamascusJakinEchols CountyStatenvilleEffingham CountyClyoEdenGuytonMeldrimRinconSpringfieldElbert CountyBowmanDewy RoseElbertonEmanuel CountyAdrianGarfieldNorristownNunezStillmoreSwainsboroTwin CityEvans CountyBellvilleClaxtonDaisyHaganFannin CountyBlue RidgeEpworthMc CaysvilleMineral BluffMorgantonFayette CountyBrooksFayettevillePeachtree CityTyroneFloyd CountyArmucheeCave SpringCoosaLindaleMount BerryRomeShannonSilver CreekForsyth CountyCummingFranklin CountyCanonCarnesvilleFranklin SpringsLavoniaRoystonFulton CountyAlpharettaAtlantaDuluthFairburnPalmettoRed OakRoswellUnion CityGilmer CountyCherry LogEast EllijayEllijayGlascock CountyGibsonMitchellGlynn CountyBrunswickJekyll IslandSaint Simons IslandSea IslandGordon CountyCalhounFairmountOakmanPlainvilleRangerResacaSugar ValleyGrady CountyCairoCalvaryWhighamGreene CountyGreensboroSiloamUnion PointWhite PlainsGwinnett CountyBufordDaculaDuluthGraysonLawrencevilleLilburnNorcrossNorth MetroSnellvilleSuwaneeHabersham CountyAltoClarkesvilleCorneliaDemorestMount AiryTurnervilleHall CountyChestnut MountainClermontFlowery BranchGainesvilleGillsvilleLulaMurrayvilleOakwoodHancock CountySpartaHaralson CountyBremenBuchananFeltonTallapoosaWacoHarris CountyCataulaEllerslieHamiltonPine MountainPine Mountain ValleyShilohWaverly HallHart CountyBowersvilleHartwellHeard CountyFranklinGlennHenry CountyHamptonLocust GroveMcdonoughStockbridgeHouston CountyBonaireCentervilleClinchfieldElkoKathleenPerryWarner RobinsIrwin CountyIrwinvilleMysticOcillaWrayJackson CountyBraseltonCommerceHoschtonJeffersonNicholsonPendergrassTalmoJasper CountyHillsboroMonticelloShady DaleJeff Davis CountyDentonHazlehurstJefferson CountyAveraBartowLouisvilleMatthewsStapletonWadleyWrensJenkins CountyMillenPerkinsJohnson CountyKiteWrightsvilleJones CountyGrayHaddockLamar CountyBarnesvilleMilnerLanier CountyLakelandStocktonLaurens CountyCadwellDexterDublinDudleyEast DublinMontroseRentzRockledgeLee CountyLeesburgSmithvilleLiberty CountyAllenhurstFlemingFort StewartHinesvilleMidwayRiceboroWalthourvilleLincoln CountyLincolntonLong CountyLudowiciLowndes CountyHahiraLake ParkMoody A F BNaylorValdostaLumpkin CountyDahlonegaMacon CountyIdealMarshallvilleMontezumaOglethorpeMadison CountyCarltonColbertComerDanielsvilleHullIlaMarion CountyBuena VistaMaukMcduffie CountyBonevilleDearingThomsonMcintosh CountyCrescentDarienMeridianSapelo IslandTownsendMeriwether CountyGayGreenvilleLuthersvilleManchesterWarm SpringsWoodburyMiller CountyColquittMitchell CountyBacontonCamillaCottonPelhamSale CityMonroe CountyBolingbrokeCullodenForsythJulietteSmarrMontgomery CountyAileyAlstonMount VernonTarrytownUvaldaMorgan CountyBostwickBuckheadHigh ShoalsMadisonRutledgeMurray CountyChatsworthCiscoCrandallEtonTenngaMuscogee CountyColumbusFort BenningFortsonMidlandUpatoiNewton CountyCovingtonMansfieldNewbornOxfordPorterdaleOconee CountyBishopBogartFarmingtonWatkinsvilleOglethorpe CountyArnoldsvilleCrawfordLexingtonMaxeysStephensPaulding CountyDallasHiramPeach CountyByronFort ValleyPickens CountyJasperMarble HillTalking RockTatePierce CountyBlackshearBristolMershonOffermanPattersonPike CountyConcordMeansvilleMolenaWilliamsonZebulonPolk CountyAragonCedartownEsom HillRockmartPulaski CountyHawkinsvillePutnam CountyEatontonQuitman CountyGeorgetownMorrisRabun CountyClaytonDillardLakemontMountain CityRabun GapTallulah FallsTigerWileyRandolph CountyColemanCuthbertShellmanRichmond CountyAugustaBlytheGracewoodHephzibahRockdale CountyConyersSchley CountyEllavilleScreven CountyDoverNewingtonOliverRocky FordSylvaniaSeminole CountyDonalsonvilleIron CitySpalding CountyExperimentGriffinOrchard HillStephens CountyEastanolleeMartinToccoaToccoa FallsStewart CountyLouvaleLumpkinOmahaRichlandSumter CountyAmericusAndersonvilleCobbDe SotoLesliePlainsTalbot CountyBox SpringsGenevaJunction CityTalbottonWoodlandTaliaferro CountyCrawfordvilleSharonTattnall CountyCobbtownCollinsGlennvilleManassasReidsvilleTaylor CountyButlerHowardReynoldsRupertTelfair CountyHelenaJacksonvilleLumber CityMc RaeScotlandTerrell CountyBronwoodDawsonParrottSasserThomas CountyBostonCoolidgeMeigsOchlockneePavoThomasvilleTift CountyBrookfieldChulaOmegaTiftonTy TyToombs CountyLyonsVidaliaTowns CountyHiawasseeYoung HarrisTreutlen CountySopertonTroup CountyHogansvilleLagrangeWest PointTurner CountyAshburnRebeccaSycamoreTwiggs CountyDanvilleDry BranchJeffersonvilleUnion CountyBlairsvilleSuchesUpson CountyThe RockThomastonYatesvilleWalker CountyChickamaugaFlintstoneLa FayetteLookout MountainRock SpringRossvilleWalton CountyGood HopeJerseyLoganvilleMonroeSocial CircleWare CountyManorMillwoodWaresboroWaycrossWarren CountyCamakJewellMesenaNorwoodWarrentonWashington CountyDavisboroHarrisonOconeeSandersvilleTennilleWarthenWayne CountyJesupOdumScrevenWebster CountyPrestonWestonWheeler CountyAlamoGlenwoodWhite CountyClevelandHelenSautee NacoocheeWhitfield CountyCohuttaDaltonRocky FaceTunnel HillWilcox CountyAbbevillePineviewPittsRochelleSevilleWilkes CountyRayleTignallWashingtonWilkinson CountyAllentownGordonIrwintonMc IntyreToomsboroWorth CountyOakfieldPoulanSumnerSylvesterWarwickView all Georgia  Lawyers or browse by county.Lawyers in Major Cities in GeorgiaAthensAtlantaAugustaBrunswickColumbusMaconSavannahValdostaAll CITIESAAbbevilleAcworthAdairsvilleAdelAdrianAileyAlamoAlapahaAlbanyAllenhurstAllentownAlmaAlpharettaAlstonAltoAmbroseAmericusAndersonvilleApplingArabiAragonArgyleArlingtonArmucheeArnoldsvilleAshburnAthensAtlantaAttapulgusAuburnAugustaAustellAveraAvondale EstatesAxsonBBacontonBainbridgeBaldwinBall GroundBarnesvilleBarneyBartowBarwickBaxleyBellvilleBerlinBethlehemBishopBlackshearBlairsvilleBlakelyBloomingdaleBlue RidgeBlufftonBlytheBogartBolingbrokeBonaireBonevilleBostonBostwickBowdonBowdon JunctionBowersvilleBowmanBox SpringsBraseltonBremenBrinsonBristolBronwoodBrookfieldBrookletBrooksBroxtonBrunswickBuchananBuckheadBuena VistaBufordButlerByromvilleByronCCadwellCairoCalhounCalvaryCamakCamillaCanonCantonCarltonCarnesvilleCarrolltonCartersvilleCassvilleCataulaCave SpringCecilCedar SpringsCedartownCentervilleChatsworthChaunceyCherry LogChesterChestnut MountainChickamaugaChulaCiscoClarkdaleClarkesvilleClarkstonClaxtonClaytonClermontClevelandClimaxClinchfieldClyoCobbCobbtownCochranCohuttaColbertColemanCollinsColquittColumbusComerCommerceConcordConleyConyersCoolidgeCoosaCordeleCorneliaCottonCovingtonCrandallCrawfordCrawfordvilleCrescentCullodenCummingCussetaCuthbertDDaculaDahlonegaDaisyDallasDaltonDamascusDanielsvilleDanvilleDarienDavisboroDawsonDawsonvilleDe SotoDearingDecaturDemorestDentonDewy RoseDexterDillardDixieDoerunDonalsonvilleDouglasDouglasvilleDoverDry BranchDu PontDublinDudleyDuluthEEast DublinEast EllijayEastanolleeEastmanEatontonEdenEdisonElbertonElkoEllabellEllavilleEllentonEllenwoodEllerslieEllijayEmersonEnigmaEpworthEsom HillEtonEvansExperimentFFairburnFairmountFargoFarmingtonFayettevilleFeltonFitzgeraldFlemingFlintstoneFlovillaFlowery BranchFolkstonForest ParkForsythFort BenningFort GainesFort OglethorpeFort StewartFort ValleyFortsonFowlstownFranklinFranklin SpringsFunstonGGainesvilleGarfieldGayGenevaGeorgetownGibsonGillsvilleGirardGlennGlennvilleGlenwoodGood HopeGordonGoughGracewoodGrantvilleGrayGraysonGraysvilleGreensboroGreenvilleGriffinGrovetownGuytonHHaddockHaganHahiraHamiltonHamptonHaralsonHardwickHarlemHarrisonHartsfieldHartwellHawkinsvilleHazlehurstHelenHelenaHephzibahHiawasseeHigh ShoalsHillsboroHinesvilleHiramHobokenHogansvilleHolly SpringsHomerHomervilleHortenseHoschtonHowardHullIIdealIlaIron CityIrwintonIrwinvilleJJacksonJacksonvilleJakinJasperJeffersonJeffersonvilleJekyll IslandJenkinsburgJerseyJesupJewellJonesboroJulietteJunction CityKKathleenKennesawKeysvilleKings BayKingslandKingstonKiteKnoxvilleLLa FayetteLagrangeLake ParkLakelandLakemontLavoniaLawrencevilleLearyLebanonLeesburgLenoxLeslieLexingtonLilburnLillyLincolntonLindaleLithia SpringsLithoniaLizellaLocust GroveLoganvilleLookout MountainLouisvilleLouvaleLovejoyLudowiciLulaLumber CityLumpkinLuthersvilleLyerlyLyonsMMabletonMaconMadisonManassasManchesterManorMansfieldMarble HillMariettaMarshallvilleMartinMatthewsMaukMaxeysMaysvilleMc CaysvilleMc IntyreMc RaeMcdonoughMeansvilleMeigsMeldrimMenloMeridianMershonMesenaMetterMidlandMidvilleMidwayMilanMilledgevilleMillenMillwoodMilnerMineral BluffMitchellMolenaMonroeMontezumaMonticelloMontroseMoody A F BMorelandMorganMorgantonMorrisMorrowMorvenMoultrieMount AiryMount BerryMount VernonMount ZionMountain CityMurrayvilleMusellaMysticNNahuntaNashvilleNaylorNelsonNewbornNewingtonNewnanNewtonNichollsNicholsonNorcrossNorman ParkNorristownNorth MetroNorwoodNunezOOakfieldOakmanOakwoodOchlockneeOcillaOconeeOdumOffermanOglethorpeOliverOmahaOmegaOrchard HillOxfordPPalmettoParrottPattersonPavoPeachtree CityPearsonPelhamPembrokePendergrassPerkinsPerryPine LakePine MountainPine Mountain ValleyPinehurstPineviewPittsPlainsPlainvillePoolerPortalPorterdalePoulanPowder SpringsPrestonPulaskiPutneyQQuitmanRRabun GapRangerRay CityRayleRebeccaRed OakRedanRegisterReidsvilleRentzResacaRexReynoldsRhineRiceboroRichlandRichmond HillRinconRinggoldRising FawnRiverdaleRobertaRochelleRock SpringRockledgeRockmartRocky FaceRocky FordRomeRoopvilleRossvilleRoswellRoystonRupertRutledgeRydalSSaint GeorgeSaint MarysSaint Simons IslandSale CitySandersvilleSapelo IslandSardisSargentSasserSautee NacoocheeSavannahScotlandScottdaleScrevenSea IslandSenoiaSevilleShady DaleShannonSharonSharpsburgShellmanShilohSiloamSilver CreekSmarrSmithvilleSmyrnaSnellvilleSocial CircleSopertonSparksSpartaSpringfieldStapletonStatenvilleStatesboroStathamStephensStillmoreStockbridgeStocktonStone MountainSuchesSugar ValleySummervilleSumnerSunny SideSurrencySuwaneeSwainsboroSycamoreSylvaniaSylvesterTTalbottonTalking RockTallapoosaTallulah FallsTalmoTarrytownTateTaylorsvilleTempleTenngaTennilleThe RockThomastonThomasvilleThomsonTiftonTigerTignallToccoaToccoa FallsToomsboroTownsendTrentonTrionTuckerTunnel HillTurinTurnervilleTwin CityTy TyTybee IslandTyroneUUnadillaUnion CityUnion PointUpatoiUvaldaVValdostaVarnellVidaliaViennaVilla RicaWWacoWadleyWaleskaWalthourvilleWaresboroWarm SpringsWarner RobinsWarrentonWarthenWarwickWashingtonWatkinsvilleWaverlyWaverly HallWaycrossWaynesboroWaynesvilleWest GreenWest PointWestonWhighamWhiteWhite OakWhite PlainsWhitesburgWildwoodWileyWillacoocheeWilliamsonWinderWinstonWintervilleWoodbineWoodburyWoodlandWoodstockWrayWrensWrightsvilleYYatesvilleYoung HarrisZZebulon









 800-923-0641


Free Help: Use This Form or Call 800-943-8690











Call me for fastest results!800-943-8690


Free Help: Use This Form or Call 800-943-8690


























                               By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                                Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                                Terms of Use, and 
                                 Privacy Policy. Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                             




















TIPSLawyer.com makes finding Georgia Lawyers fast and easy. Search for an attorney in Georgia by top Georgia cities or by your specific city. Or search for Georgia attorneys by county. Or refine your search for Georgia lawyers by legal practice area.  Find a quality and affordable lawyer by reviewing detail profiles for Georgia attorneys. Many Lawyer.com featured Lawyers in Georgia will offer free legal consultations and all have Georgia law expertise.




PRACTICE AREAS


Accident & InjuryBankruptcy & DebtBusinessCivil & Human RightsConsumer RightsCriminalDivorce & Family LawEmploymentEnvironmental LawEstateGovernmentHealth CareImmigrationIndustry SpecialtiesIntellectual PropertyInternationalLawsuit & DisputeMotor VehicleReal EstateTaxOther 















  
    








QuickSearch
                         
                        


 near 

 

                          GO
                        









Lawyer Search


Legal Protection Plan


For Lawyers



                    My Account



                    About Us










Broad Search:

Keyword:






Practice Area:


Please Select (optional)
Accident & Injury     All Accident & Injury     Animal Bite     Asbestos & Mesothelioma     Aviation Accident     Car Accident     Defamation & Slander     Malpractice     Medical Malpractice     Personal Injury     Products Liability     Property Damage     Railroad Injury     Slip & Fall Accident     Toxic Mold & Tort     Wrongful Death     Workers' CompensationBankruptcy & Debt     All Bankruptcy & Debt     Bankruptcy     Collection     Credit & Debt     Reorganization     WorkoutBusiness     All Business     Administrative Law     Antitrust     Banking & Finance     Business Organization     Contract     Corporate     Insurance     Merger & Acquisition     SecuritiesCivil & Human Rights     All Civil & Human Rights     Civil Rights     Constitutional Law     Discrimination     Elder Law     Native PeopleConsumer Rights     All Consumer Rights     Consumer Protection     Identity TheftCriminal     All Criminal     DUI-DWI     Felony     Misdemeanor     RICO Act     Traffic     White Collar CrimeDivorce & Family Law     All Divorce & Family Law     Adoption     Child Custody     Child Support     Divorce     Family LawEmployment     All Employment     Employee Rights     Employment Contracts     Employment Discrimination     Family Medical Leave Act (FMLA)     Labor Law     Occupational Safety & Health     Pension & Benefits     Sexual Harassment     Whistleblower     Workers' Compensation     Wrongful TerminationEnvironmental Law     All Environmental Law     Natural Resources     Waste & Pollution     Environmental Law OtherEstate     All Estate     Estate Planning     Trusts     Wills & Probate     Power of AttorneyGovernment     All Government     Election & Political     Government Agencies     Government Contract     Legislative Practice     Permits     Public Interest Law     Social Security     State and Local     US Courts     WelfareHealth Care     All Health Care     Medical Products & Devices     Medicare & Medicaid     Pharmaceutical Product     Health Care OtherImmigration     All Immigration     Deportation     VisaIndustry Specialties     All Industry Specialties     Admiralty & Maritime     Advertising     Agriculture     Aviation     Communication & Media Law     Energy     Entertainment     Gaming & Alcohol     Oil & Gas     Science, Technology & Internet     Transportation & Shipping     Other IndustriesIntellectual Property     All Intellectual Property     Copyright     International Intellectual Property     Patent     TrademarkInternational     All International     Foreign Investment     International Tax     International Trade     International OtherLawsuit & Dispute     All Lawsuit & Dispute     Arbitration     Class Action     Dispute Resolution     Lawsuit     Litigation     MediationMotor Vehicle     All Motor Vehicle     Defect and Lemon Law     TrafficReal Estate     All Real Estate     Timeshare     Construction     Eminent Domain     Foreclosure     Land Use & Zoning     Landlord-Tenant     Real Estate OtherTax     All Tax     Corporate Tax     Income Tax     Sales & Use Tax     Tax LitigationOther     All Other     Education     Ethics     Juvenile Law     Military     Power of Attorney





Location:

miles
                                          


Search










Advanced Search:





Lawyers
Law Firms
Practice Areas
International
Articles
Law Schools
Resources








Lawyer.com Legal Protection Plan


Prepaid legal service that can help youand your family save money with affordablefamily legal insurance.
Unlimited 60-minute free consultations
Save 25% on legal fees
Up to $1 Million identity theft protection and more!




See All Benefits
» Join Now








Premium Membership

For Lawyers
Benefits
Partner Discounts
Preferred Partners
Law Firms



Additional Services

LawyerLine™
LawSite Express
TopFirm Listings
AdWords Review
Jumpstart Package
SEO Review
Website Evaluation



Resources

Profile LawPoints
Sponsorships
Legal Articles
CLE Class
Seconds Count
International








My Account Details

Member Login PageForgot Password?New user? Sign Up 










Login









Company Information
Lawyer.com Team
Company Culture
News & Press Releases




Contact Us
Lawyer FAQ
Testimonials




Privacy Policy
Settlement Blog
Legal Marketing Blog




























Lawyer.com - Atlanta Lawyer


















Ask A Lawyer
Tell Us Your Case Information for Fastest Lawyer Match!






 
                              Please include all relevant details from your case including where, when, and who it involoves. Case details that can effectively describe the legal situation while also staying concise generally receive the best responses from lawyers.




Briefly Describe Your Case:









Your Contact Info:


name



Cell Phone Number



Email





Your Case Location:

zip





By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                                  Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                                  Terms of Use, and 
                                   Privacy Policy. Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                                




















Georgia / Atlanta Lawyer






                  Atlanta Lawyer, Georgia                







  SPONSORED LAWYERS

1-10 of 217 matches. Page 1 of 22   






Michael Shane Welsh✓ VERIFIEDEmployment Discrimination, Tax Litigation, DUI-DWI, Sexual Harassment, Divorce & Family Law
Solving problems for individuals and small businesses in State and Federal Courts since 1993.
We have been solving problems for individuals, families and businesses since 1996. We represent individuals and businesses in disputes and negotiat... (more)
FREE CONSULTATION CONTACT800-716-4161
 275 14th Street, NW, Atlanta, GA 30318 Profile LAWPOINTS™75/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers


Ronald D. Reemsnyder✓ VERIFIEDProducts Liability, Personal Injury, Wills, Wrongful Death, Professional Malpractice

Ron Reemsnyder is here to help you with your legal issues. Whether you are an individual with a personal need, or a business requiring an employment a... (more)
FREE CONSULTATION CONTACT800-803-3091
 2400 International Tower, Peachtree Center, Atlanta, GA 30303 Profile LAWPOINTS™78/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers


Erin  Elliott✓ VERIFIEDImmigration

Erin Elliott is the managing attorney of Elliott Immigration Law LLC.  She focuses her practice 100% on immigration law.  She represents individuals, ... (more)
CONTACT800-969-3781
 1401 Peachtree Street, Atlanta, GA 30309 Profile LAWPOINTS™71/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers


R. Craig Thrift✓ VERIFIEDTimeshare, Real Estate, Merger & Acquisition, Franchising

Mr. Thrift is a corporate/transactional, real estate, fractional ownership/timeshare and licensing attorney, active and in good-standing in the State ... (more)
CONTACT800-941-1050
 201 17th Street, Atlanta, GA 30363 Profile LAWPOINTS™71/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers





Bobby  DevadossEmployment, Federal, Federal Employees, US Courts, Labor Arbitration
Atlanta, GA Federal Employee Lawyer
The Devadoss Law Firm, P.L.L.C. is committed to ensuring governmental employees are afforded proper representation in employment arbitration and emplo... (more)
FREE CONSULTATION CONTACT
 235 Peachtree Street Northeast, Atlanta, GA 30303 Profile LAWPOINTS™67/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers


Amanda  Farahany✓ VERIFIEDSexual Harassment, Family Medical Leave Act (FMLA), Employment Discrimination, Wrongful Termination, Employee Rights

Amanda Farahany is the managing partner at the Atlanta law firm of Barrett & Farahany, LLP, representing individuals in employment, libel, overtime, a... (more)
FREE CONSULTATION CONTACT404-487-0910
 1100 Peachtree Street, Atlanta, GA 30309 Profile LAWPOINTS™65/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers


Jodi  Dick✓ VERIFIEDCriminal, Accident & Injury, Immigration

Criminal Defense of all types of cases including misdemeanor and major felony drug cases (and associated forfeiture-seizure of assets), drug trafficki... (more)
CONTACT800-596-9070
 235 Peachtree Street, Atlanta, GA 30303 Profile LAWPOINTS™66/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers


Sidney  Weinstein✓ VERIFIEDCar Accident, Personal Injury, Wrongful Death, Slip & Fall Accident, Insurance
24/7, Free Consultation!   Get My Personal, ExperiencedAttention. Well Reviewed.
So, why hire me? I began practicing law in Atlanta, Georgia after several years working in business. My ongoing experiences as an attorney and a hands... (more)
FREE CONSULTATION CONTACT800-974-2231
 97 Leslie Street SE, Atlanta, GA 30317 Profile LAWPOINTS™88/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers


Thomas Edward Reynolds✓ VERIFIEDEntertainment, Accident & Injury, Real Estate, Business

With over 35 years of combined experience, Reynolds Law Group provides the focus of a boutique law firm with experience representing a broad range of ... (more)
CONTACT800-741-3640
 200 Peachtree Street, Atlanta, GA 30303 Profile LAWPOINTS™63/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers


Dorey  Cole✓ VERIFIEDAccident & Injury, Criminal, Employment, Real Estate, Litigation
Other Jurisdictions: Illinois & Louisiana
Cole Law Group, LLC is a multi-jurisdictional law firm that has represented and recovered damages for personal injury victims in Georgia, Illinois, an... (more)
FREE CONSULTATION CONTACT
 1401 Peachtree Street, Atlanta, GA 30309 Profile LAWPOINTS™64/100LAWPOINTS™ measure the overall completeness of a Lawyer's profile. More complete profiles are ranked higher and help visitors select the right lawyer faster.We help paid Members build more complete and informative profiles.LAWPOINTS™ do not measure a Lawyer's reputation. More Info for Lawyers










 800-923-0641


Free Help: Use This Form or Call 800-943-8690











Call me for fastest results!800-943-8690


Free Help: Use This Form or Call 800-943-8690


























                               By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                                Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                                Terms of Use, and 
                                 Privacy Policy. Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                             






















 
TIPSLawyer.com makes finding Atlanta Lawyers fast and easy. Refine your search for Atlanta lawyers by legal practice area. Find a quality and affordable lawyer by reviewing detail profiles for Atlanta attorneys. Many Lawyer.com featured Lawyers in Georgia will offer free legal consultations and all have Georgia law expertise.

SAMPLE LEGAL CASES


GRIFFIN INDUSTRIES, INC. v. GEORGIA DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTUREGriffin Industries, Inc. ("Griffin"), filed suit against the Georgia Department of Agriculture and the 
Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture (collectively, "the Department") seeking an order 
compelling the Department to comply with Griffin's request for records under the Georgia ...
Harmon v. INNOMED TECHNOLOGIES, INC.... Kevin C. Harmon appeals the grant of summary judgment against him in this lawsuit, wherein
 he claims ownership of certain intellectual property purchased by Innomed Technologies, Inc. ...
 Harmon also claimed that he held equitable title to the intellectual property. ...
Atlanta Oculoplastic Surgery v. Nestlehutt... HUNSTEIN, Chief Justice. This case requires us to assess the constitutionality of OCGA §
 51-13-1, which limits awards of noneconomic damages in medical malpractice cases to a
 predetermined amount. ... Nestlehutt, along with her husband, sued Oculus for medical malpractice. ... 



SORT BY:- Distance- Name- Location- LAWPOINTS™

FILTER BY:


Free Consultation
Male
Female
Suspended




PRACTICE AREAS


Accident & InjuryBankruptcy & DebtBusinessCivil & Human RightsConsumer RightsCriminalDivorce & Family LawEmploymentEnvironmental LawEstateGovernmentHealth CareImmigrationIndustry SpecialtiesIntellectual PropertyInternationalLawsuit & DisputeMotor VehicleReal EstateTaxOther 



NEARBY CITY SUGGESTIONS

AthensAtlantaAugustaBrunswickColumbusMaconSavannahValdosta













  
    








QuickSearch
                         
                        


 near 

 

                          GO
                        









Lawyer Search


Legal Protection Plan


For Lawyers



                    My Account



                    About Us










Broad Search:

Keyword:






Practice Area:


Please Select (optional)
Accident & Injury     All Accident & Injury     Animal Bite     Asbestos & Mesothelioma     Aviation Accident     Car Accident     Defamation & Slander     Malpractice     Medical Malpractice     Personal Injury     Products Liability     Property Damage     Railroad Injury     Slip & Fall Accident     Toxic Mold & Tort     Wrongful Death     Workers' CompensationBankruptcy & Debt     All Bankruptcy & Debt     Bankruptcy     Collection     Credit & Debt     Reorganization     WorkoutBusiness     All Business     Administrative Law     Antitrust     Banking & Finance     Business Organization     Contract     Corporate     Insurance     Merger & Acquisition     SecuritiesCivil & Human Rights     All Civil & Human Rights     Civil Rights     Constitutional Law     Discrimination     Elder Law     Native PeopleConsumer Rights     All Consumer Rights     Consumer Protection     Identity TheftCriminal     All Criminal     DUI-DWI     Felony     Misdemeanor     RICO Act     Traffic     White Collar CrimeDivorce & Family Law     All Divorce & Family Law     Adoption     Child Custody     Child Support     Divorce     Family LawEmployment     All Employment     Employee Rights     Employment Contracts     Employment Discrimination     Family Medical Leave Act (FMLA)     Labor Law     Occupational Safety & Health     Pension & Benefits     Sexual Harassment     Whistleblower     Workers' Compensation     Wrongful TerminationEnvironmental Law     All Environmental Law     Natural Resources     Waste & Pollution     Environmental Law OtherEstate     All Estate     Estate Planning     Trusts     Wills & Probate     Power of AttorneyGovernment     All Government     Election & Political     Government Agencies     Government Contract     Legislative Practice     Permits     Public Interest Law     Social Security     State and Local     US Courts     WelfareHealth Care     All Health Care     Medical Products & Devices     Medicare & Medicaid     Pharmaceutical Product     Health Care OtherImmigration     All Immigration     Deportation     VisaIndustry Specialties     All Industry Specialties     Admiralty & Maritime     Advertising     Agriculture     Aviation     Communication & Media Law     Energy     Entertainment     Gaming & Alcohol     Oil & Gas     Science, Technology & Internet     Transportation & Shipping     Other IndustriesIntellectual Property     All Intellectual Property     Copyright     International Intellectual Property     Patent     TrademarkInternational     All International     Foreign Investment     International Tax     International Trade     International OtherLawsuit & Dispute     All Lawsuit & Dispute     Arbitration     Class Action     Dispute Resolution     Lawsuit     Litigation     MediationMotor Vehicle     All Motor Vehicle     Defect and Lemon Law     TrafficReal Estate     All Real Estate     Timeshare     Construction     Eminent Domain     Foreclosure     Land Use & Zoning     Landlord-Tenant     Real Estate OtherTax     All Tax     Corporate Tax     Income Tax     Sales & Use Tax     Tax LitigationOther     All Other     Education     Ethics     Juvenile Law     Military     Power of Attorney





Location:

miles
                                          


Search










Advanced Search:





Lawyers
Law Firms
Practice Areas
International
Articles
Law Schools
Resources








Lawyer.com Legal Protection Plan


Prepaid legal service that can help youand your family save money with affordablefamily legal insurance.
Unlimited 60-minute free consultations
Save 25% on legal fees
Up to $1 Million identity theft protection and more!




See All Benefits
» Join Now








Premium Membership

For Lawyers
Benefits
Partner Discounts
Preferred Partners
Law Firms



Additional Services

LawyerLine™
LawSite Express
TopFirm Listings
AdWords Review
Jumpstart Package
SEO Review
Website Evaluation



Resources

Profile LawPoints
Sponsorships
Legal Articles
CLE Class
Seconds Count
International








My Account Details

Member Login PageForgot Password?New user? Sign Up 










Login









Company Information
Lawyer.com Team
Company Culture
News & Press Releases




Contact Us
Lawyer FAQ
Testimonials




Privacy Policy
Settlement Blog
Legal Marketing Blog




























Greerson Mcmullen - Attorney in Atlanta, GA - Lawyer.com























Ask A Lawyer
Tell Us Your Case Information for Fastest Lawyer Match!








                    Please include all relevant details from your case including where, when, and who it involves.                                          
                    Case details that can effectively describe the legal situation while also staying concise generally receive the best responses from lawyers.
                




Briefly Describe Your Case:









Your Contact Info:


name



Cell Phone Number



Email





Your Case Location:

zip





By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                            Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                            Terms of Use, and 
                             Privacy Policy. Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                            
















GeorgiaAtlantaGreerson Mcmullen


Greerson Greene Mcmullen








Greerson Greene Mcmullen 
                                    



General Practice




Law School:

U of Virginia  



Status:
Inactive


Licensed:
9 years














675-1 West Paces Ferry Rd, Nw
30327
Atlanta
GA









                                Profile LAWPOINTS™9/100
                            



                        No Misconduct Found✓


                        Reviews Pro Bono Cases✓


Upgrade to a premium listing


Update your listing




LAWYERID™Not Available





















                    Contact Mcmullen















Briefly Describe Your Case:










Your Contact Info:








Your Case Location:



  FREE: Also send inquiry to other qualified local Lawyers.











                By submitting this lawyer request, I confirm I have read and agree to the 
                Consent to Receive Email, Phone, Text Messages, 
                Terms of Use, and 
                 Privacy Policy.  Information provided may not be privileged or confidential.
                



                                                  Submit
                                                










×Close
Would you like us to contact more lawyers?



Click below to submit your inquiry to more local lawyers (for free!).Save time, get options, and find the perfect match!

Send to Local Lawyers
No, Thanks, I only want Greerson Greene Mcmullen .









TOP LOCAL LAWYERS










Jamie G. Miller
Federal Trial Practice, Labor Law, Employment, Personal Injury, Business
Atlanta, GA 30305 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




David Alan Garfinkel
Divorce & Family Law, Divorce, Family Law, Child Custody, Child Support
Atlanta, GA 30305 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Aaron N. Freedman
Criminal, DUI-DWI, Felony, Misdemeanor, Personal Injury
Atlanta, GA 30326 (Fulton County)





CONTACT








Bryce Angell
Personal Injury, Car Accident, Wrongful Death, Medical Malpractice, Slip & Fall Accident
Atlanta, GA 30326 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Kevin Ford
Accident & Injury, Personal Injury, Car Accident, Wrongful Death
Atlanta, GA 30305 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Timothy F. Coen
Accident & Injury, Lawsuit & Dispute
Atlanta, GA 30327 (Fulton County)





CONTACT








Glenn Eric Kushel
Accident & Injury, Medical Malpractice, Personal Injury, Wrongful Death, Car Accident
Atlanta, GA 30326 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Neil Richard Flit
Car Accident, Personal Injury, Slip & Fall Accident, Wrongful Death
Atlanta, GA 30326 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




Michael Weinstein
Accident & Injury, Car Accident, Wrongful Death, Divorce & Family Law, Criminal
Atlanta, GA 30342 (Fulton County)





CONTACT








Matt Berry
Divorce, Bankruptcy, Social Security, Car Accident, Family Law
Atlanta, GA 30324 (Fulton County)





CONTACT




David Michael Zagoria
Accident & Injury, Car Accident, Animal Bite, Wrongful Death, Medical Malpractice
Atlanta, GA 30329 (Dekalb County)





CONTACT




R. Craig Thrift
Timeshare, Real Estate, Merger & Acquisition, Franchising
Atlanta, GA 30363 (Fulton County)





CONTACT











Education






School
Degree
Major
Graduation




University of Virginia School of Law

Law School
N/A






Admission






State / Court
Date




Tennessee
2009






Additional Info



Service Type:General


Update Date:2016-06-22




Lawyer Badges


















33.848821,-84.409459













MAIN LOCATION


675-1 West Paces Ferry Rd, NwAtlanta, GA 30327




SAMPLE LEGAL CASES



President Trump States That He Would Stick With List of Potential Nominees for Future SCOTUS Vacancy

                    President Donald Trump told the Washington Times in an interview that in the event another Supreme Court seat opens, he would pick a nominee from his campaign list of potential nominees.
                




CLIENT APPRECIATION EVENT 2017 – MARK YOUR CALENDARS!

                    MARK YOUR CALENDARS!
                


















                                         
                                    








QuickSearch 
                                                            




near





                                                                            GO
                                                                        







Lawyer Search


Legal Protection Plan


For Lawyers



                                                    My Account



                                                    About Us










Broad Search:

Keyword:





Practice Area:


Please Select (optional)
Accident & Injury     All Accident & Injury     Animal Bite     Asbestos & Mesothelioma     Aviation Accident     Car Accident     Defamation & Slander     Malpractice     Medical Malpractice     Personal Injury     Products Liability     Property Damage     Railroad Injury     Slip & Fall Accident     Toxic Mold & Tort     Workers' Compensation     Wrongful DeathBankruptcy & Debt     All Bankruptcy & Debt     Bankruptcy     Collection     Credit & Debt     Reorganization     WorkoutBusiness     All Business     Administrative Law     Antitrust     Banking & Finance     Business Organization     Contract     Corporate     Insurance     Merger & Acquisition     SecuritiesCivil & Human Rights     All Civil & Human Rights     Civil Rights     Constitutional Law     Discrimination     Elder Law     Native PeopleConsumer Rights     All Consumer Rights     Consumer Protection     Identity TheftCriminal     All Criminal     DUI-DWI     Felony     Misdemeanor     RICO Act     Traffic     White Collar CrimeDivorce & Family Law     All Divorce & Family Law     Adoption     Child Custody     Child Support     Divorce     Family LawEmployment     All Employment     Employee Rights     Employment Contracts     Employment Discrimination     Family Medical Leave Act (FMLA)     Labor Law     Occupational Safety & Health     Pension & Benefits     Sexual Harassment     Whistleblower     Workers' Compensation     Wrongful TerminationEnvironmental Law     All Environmental Law     Natural Resources     Waste & Pollution     Environmental Law OtherEstate     All Estate     Estate Planning     Power of Attorney     Trusts     Wills & ProbateGovernment     All Government     Election & Political     Government Agencies     Government Contract     Legislative Practice     Permits     Public Interest Law     Social Security     State and Local     US Courts     WelfareHealth Care     All Health Care     Medical Products & Devices     Medicare & Medicaid     Pharmaceutical Product     Health Care OtherImmigration     All Immigration     Deportation     VisaIndustry Specialties     All Industry Specialties     Admiralty & Maritime     Advertising     Agriculture     Aviation     Communication & Media Law     Energy     Entertainment     Gaming & Alcohol     Oil & Gas     Science, Technology & Internet     Transportation & Shipping     Other IndustriesIntellectual Property     All Intellectual Property     Copyright     International Intellectual Property     Patent     TrademarkInternational     All International     Foreign Investment     International Tax     International Trade     International OtherLawsuit & Dispute     All Lawsuit & Dispute     Arbitration     Class Action     Dispute Resolution     Lawsuit     Litigation     MediationMotor Vehicle     All Motor Vehicle     Defect and Lemon Law     TrafficReal Estate     All Real Estate   Timeshare     Construction     Eminent Domain     Foreclosure     Land Use & Zoning     Landlord-Tenant     Real Estate OtherTax     All Tax     Corporate Tax     Income Tax     Sales & Use Tax     Tax LitigationOther     All Other     Education     Ethics     Juvenile Law     Military     Power of Attorney




Location:



                                                                             miles
                                                                            

Search









Advanced Search:





Lawyers
Law Firms
Practice Areas
International
Articles
Law Schools
Resources









Lawyer.com Legal Protection Plan

Prepaid legal service that can help youand your family save money withaffordable family legal insurance.
Unlimited 60-minute free consultations
Save 25% on legal fees
Up to $1 Million identity theft protectionand more!




 

See All Benefits
» Join Now







Premium Membership

For Lawyers
Benefits
Partner Discounts
Preferred Partners
Law Firms



Additional Services

LawyerLine™
LawSite Express
TopFirm Listings
AdWords Review
Jumpstart Package
SEO Review
Website Evaluation



Resources

Profile LawPoints
Sponsorships
Legal Articles
CLE Class
Seconds Count
International







My Account Details

Member Login Page
Forgot Password?
New user? Sign Up



Log in to Lawyer.com







Log in








Company Information
Lawyer.com Team
Company Culture
News & Press Releases




Contact Us
Lawyer FAQ
Testimonials




Privacy Policy
Settlement Blog
Legal Marketing Blog























              Greerson Greene Mcmullen - Luxembourg     Dato Capital         Home Help Pricing Contact us Español        Log In New User     Luxembourg  Greerson Greene Mcmullen Mcmullen Greerson Greene  Download Report Watch this director  Reports Positions Business areas History Similar name    Reports    Director Report (Luxembourg)    It includesthe current and past appointments and positions in companies, with relevant data about each companya list of other directors who held positions in the same companies at the same timerelated news search+Dedicated Customer Support by email     Positions TYPE MANAGER    Business areas Active Districts  Luxembourg     History  Partial History  Date Event Region  December, 2016Resignation as TYPE MANAGERLuxembourg     Executives with similar name    Chris Mcmullen, Spain   Amanda Mcmullen, United Kingdom   Maureen Mcmullen, United Kingdom   Charlotte Anne Mcmullen, United Kingdom      This information comes from public records and matching is performed only by full name so it's possible that the information refers to more than one person  Personal data protection and legal information   Back to Top       Dato Capital 
   ©2017 DATO CAPITAL LTD London   About Us Legal information Privacy PolicyCookie PolicyTerms of Service Contact us  Search companies and directors from UK Gibraltar Luxembourg Spain Netherlands Curaçao Panama Malta Cayman Islands British Virgin Islands      Google+ Twitter      We use cookies (including third party cookies) to perform navigation analytics. Continuing browsing you consent to receive them. For more information visit our Cookie policy     











































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



 Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...




First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





we also search social networks:

















This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search






  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...



First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search





  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip






















Background Checks and Public Records Search - Truthfinder








 


















Call Toll Free!  (800) 699-8081



Public Records Search
Social Media, Photos, Police Records, Background Checks, Contact Information and Much More!









START HERE - Try searching a friend, relative, celebrity, yourself, or someone else you might know...




First Name:





Last Name:





City:





State:


All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
District Of Columbia
Delaware
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virgin Islands
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





check for social media accounts:




















This is me
Searching for yourself?




Search






  This secure connection is confirmed




We're Very Popular















What Our Happy Users Are Saying




"TruthFinder.com is freakishly accurate… Really scary how much info is out there." -Zac K.


"You found an old friend for me. Thank you." -Nancy V.


"TruthFinder is an excellent site for finding out about someone." -Sherrie F.


"This site is so wonderful. I found my lost godchildren and their mom. Thank you so much." -Lawrence W.


"This is one way to really know a potential date." -Charmaine R.


"Your service is more than perfect. It is a blessing. Thank you for the very hard work that you do." -Richard B.


"Truthfinder is a very accurate updated system. Their information is proper. And can be very helpful too." -Juan M.









Notice
This site contains REAL police records (court records of driving citations, speeding tickets, felonies, misdemeanors, sexual offenses, mugshots, etc.), background reports, photos, court documents, address information, phone numbers, and much more. Please BE CAREFUL when conducting a search and ensure all the information you enter is accurate.
Learning the truth about the history of your family and friends can be shocking, so please be cautious when using this tool.
TruthFinder does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency. We provide a lot of sensitive information that can be used to satisfy your curiosity, protect your family, and find the truth about the people in your life. You may not use our service or the information it provides to make decisions about consumer credit, employers, insurance, tenant screening, or any other purposes that would require FCRA compliance.
I Understand


Help Us Refine Your Results
Select Your Gender



Male



Female

NEXT

Skip
















